Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1719
Seller-assisted marketing plan; sale of an ongoing business; excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include the sale of an ongoing business.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 19.